Maryland, session 2025, HB0804.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
14–134.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY” MEANS A CONDOMINIUM OR
A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(3) “CONDOMINIUM” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 11–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0804*

HOUSE BILL 804
(4) “COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ARTICLE.
(5) “MULTIFAMILY DWELLING” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL BUILDING
THAT IS PART OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY WITH MULTIPLE DWELLING
UNITS, A COMMON ENTRANCE, AND COMMON AREAS, INCLUDING HALLWAYS,
ELEVATORS, AND STAIRS.
(6) “RESIDENTIAL OWNER” MEANS:
(I) A UNIT OWNER OF A CONDOMINIUM; OR
(II) A MEMBER OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(7) “SMOKE” OR “SMOKING” MEANS:
(I) THE INHALING, EXHALING, BURNING, OR CARRYING OF ANY
LIGHTED MATTER OR LIGHTED SUBSTANCE; OR
(II) THE USE OF A DEVICE TO DELIVER AEROSOLIZED OR
VAPORIZED VAPING LIQUID, AS DEFINED IN § 16.7–101 OF THE BUSINESS
REGULATION ARTICLE, TO AN INDIVIDUAL INHALING FROM THE DEVICE.
(8) “UNIT”:
(I) FOR A CONDOMINIUM, HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
11–101 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(II) FOR A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION, HAS THE
MEANING STATED IN § 5–6B–01 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS
ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A MULTIFAMILY DWELLING WITH FOUR
OR MORE DWELLING UNITS THAT ARE:
(1) USED FOR THE BENEFIT OF A RESIDENTIAL OWNER IN A COMMON
OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY; OR
(2) RENTED BY THE RESIDENTIAL OWNER OF THE DWELLING UNIT TO
A TENANT UNDER A LEASE.
(C) THE GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP COMMUNITY THAT
CONTROLS A MULTIFAMILY DWELLING SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 804 3
(1) DEVELOP A SMOKING POLICY THAT APPLIES TO ALL COMMON
AREAS IN THE MULTIFAMILY DWELLING AND IS AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE
APPLICABLE STATE AND LOCAL LAWS REGARDING SMOKING; AND
(2) PROVIDE NOTICE OF THE SMOKING POLICY TO RESIDENTIAL
OWNERS AND TENANTS OF THE MULTIFAMILY DWELLING.
(D) A POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL STATE:
(1) THE LOCATIONS WHERE SMOKING IS AUTHORIZED ON THE
PROPERTY;
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, THE
LOCATIONS WHERE SMOKING IS PROHIBITED ON THE PROPERTY;
(3) ANY CONDITIONS ON THE ABILITY TO SMOKE IN AREAS OF THE
PROPERTY WHERE SMOKING IS AUTHORIZED;
(4) THE PROCESS TO FILE A COMPLAINT AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO VIOLATES THE POLICY; AND
(5) ANY PENALTIES OR FINES FOR VIOLATING THE POLICY.
(E) A POLICY UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT LIMIT THE
RIGHT OF A RESIDENTIAL OWNER OR TENANT TO SMOKE OR ALLOW OTHER
INDIVIDUALS TO SMOKE WITHIN THE OWNER’S OR TENANT’S UNIT IF THE OWNER
OWNS OR THE TENANT RESIDES IN THE UNIT WHEN THE POLICY IS ADOPTED.
(F) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO:
(1) REQUIRE A GOVERNING BODY OF A COMMON OWNERSHIP
COMMUNITY TO INITIATE A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A TENANT OR RESIDENTIAL
OWNER FOR A VIOLATION OF A SMOKING POLICY ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION;
(2) PREEMPT A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT FROM
ENACTING AND ENFORCING MEASURES REGARDING SMOKING POLICIES IN
MULTIFAMILY DWELLINGS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT THAN A POLICY ADOPTED
UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(3) PREEMPT A RESIDENTIAL OWNER OR TENANT FROM INITIATING A
LEGAL ACTION AGAINST A TENANT OR RESIDENTIAL OWNER FOR A VIOLATION OF A
SMOKING POLICY ADOPTED UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 804
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.